Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 26 World War Orphans’ Education Fund [Repealed.]

30-26-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1869, § 1; P.L. 1934, ch. 2130, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2264, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2624, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 651, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 924, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1969, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-26-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 7, effective July 1, 1981.